Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1423
Sections, how construed.

In order to effectuate the purposes and policies prescribed in sections 70-1401 to 70-1423, the provisions of sections 70-1401 to 70-1423 shall be liberally construed.

Laws 1982, LB 852, § 23.